pt-PT: Tipo de composto de reparação: Betume epóxi para carroçarias; Betume de poliéster para carroçarias; Betume de fibra de vidro; Betume reforçado a metal; Cola para tacos de pneu; Selante de pneus; Fluido de vulcanização; Resina espessa para para-brisas; Resina fina para para-brisas; Outro
nl: Reparatiemiddel type: Plamuur epoxy; Plamuur polyester; Glasvezelplamuur; Metaalversterkt plamuur; Bandenplug-cement; Bandenafdichtmiddel; Vulkaniseervloeistof; Voorruithars dik; Voorruithars dun; Overig
fr: Type de produit de réparation: Mastic de carrosserie époxy; Mastic de carrosserie polyester; Mastic fibre de verre; Mastic renforcé de métal; Colle pour mèche de pneu; Scellant pour pneu; Fluide de vulcanisation; Résine épaisse pour pare-brise; Résine fluide pour pare-brise; Autre
zh-CN: 修补剂类型: 车身填缝环氧树脂; 车身填缝聚酯; 玻璃纤维填料; 金属加固填料; 轮胎塞胶水; 轮胎密封胶; 硫化液; 挡风玻璃树脂（稠）; 挡风玻璃树脂（稀）; 其他
sv: Typ av reparationsmassa: Epoxispackel; Polyesterspackel; Glasfiberspackel; Metallförstärkt spackel; Lim för däckplugg; Däcktätningsmedel; Vulkaniseringsvätska; Tjockt vindruteharts; Tunt vindruteharts; Annat
it: Tipo di composto di riparazione: Stucco epossidico per carrozzeria; Stucco poliestere per carrozzeria; Stucco in fibra di vetro; Stucco rinforzato con metallo; Mastice per tappi pneumatici; Sigillante per pneumatici; Fluido vulcanizzante; Resina spessa per parabrezza; Resina sottile per parabrezza; Altro
fi: Korjausainetyyppi: Korikittiepoksihartsi; Korikittipolyesteri; Lasikuitukitti; Metallivahvistettu kitti; Renkaan paikkaliima; Renkaan paikkausaine; Vulkanointineste; Tuulilasihartsi (paksu); Tuulilasihartsi (ohut); Muu
ja: 補修用化合物タイプ: ボディフィラーエポキシ; ボディフィラーポリエステル; グラスファイバーフィラー; 金属強化フィラー; タイヤプラグセメント; タイヤシーラント; 加硫液; フロントガラス用樹脂（高粘度）; フロントガラス用樹脂（低粘度）; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta mase za popravilo: Epoksi kit za popravilo karoserije; Poliestrski kit za popravilo karoserije; Polnilo iz steklenih vlaken; S kovino ojačano polnilo; Lepilo za krpanje pnevmatik; Tesnilna masa za pnevmatike; Vulkanizacijska tekočina; Gosta smola za vetrobransko steklo; Redka smola za vetrobransko steklo; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип ремонтен състав: Епоксиден кит за купе; Полиестерен кит за купе; Пълнител от фибростъкло; Металоподсилен пълнител; Лепило за фитили за гуми; Уплътнител за гуми; Вулканизираща течност; Гъста смола за предно стъкло; Рядка смола за предно стъкло; Други
el: Τύπος υλικού επισκευής: Εποξειδικός στόκος αμαξώματος; Πολυεστερικός στόκος αμαξώματος; Στόκος fiberglass; Στόκος ενισχυμένος με μέταλλο; Κόλλα για τάπες ελαστικών; Στεγανωτικό ελαστικών; Υγρό βουλκανισμού; Παχύρρευστη ρητίνη παρμπρίζ; Λεπτόρρευστη ρητίνη παρμπρίζ; Άλλο
nb: Reparasjonsblandingstype: Epoksy-sparkel; Polyester-sparkel; Glassfibersparkel; Metallforsterket sparkel; Lim for dekkplugg; Dekkforsegling; Vulkaniseringsvæske; Bilglassharpiks (tykk); Bilglassharpiks (tynn); Annet
vi: Loại hợp chất sửa chữa: Epoxy bả vỏ xe; Polyester bả vỏ xe; Keo bả sợi thủy tinh; Keo bả gia cố kim loại; Keo vá lốp; Chất trám lốp; Dung dịch lưu hóa; Nhựa dán kính chắn gió loại đặc; Nhựa dán kính chắn gió loại lỏng; Khác
da: Reparationsblandingstype: Epoxyspartelmasse; Polyesterspartelmasse; Glasfiberspartelmasse; Metalforstærket spartelmasse; Dækpropslim; Dæktætningsmiddel; Vulkaniseringsvæske; Forrudeharpiks (tyk); Forrudeharpiks (tynd); Andet
ko: 수리용 화합물 유형: 바디 필러 에폭시; 바디 필러 폴리에스터; 파이버글라스 필러; 금속 보강 필러; 타이어 플러그 시멘트; 타이어 실란트; 가황액; 윈드실드 레진(고점도); 윈드실드 레진(저점도); 기타
hu: Javítóanyag típusa: Epoxi karosszériagitt; Poliészter karosszériagitt; Üvegszálas gitt; Fémerősítésű gitt; Abroncsdugó ragasztó; Abroncs tömítőanyag; Vulkanizáló folyadék; Sűrű szélvédőgyanta; Híg szélvédőgyanta; Egyéb
pl: Typ związku naprawczego: Szpachlówka epoksydowa; Szpachlówka poliestrowa; Szpachlówka z włóknem szklanym; Szpachlówka wzmocniona metalem; Klej do kołków do opon; Uszczelniacz do opon; Płyn wulkanizacyjny; Gęsta żywica do szyb; Rzadka żywica do szyb; Inne
es: Tipo de compuesto de reparación: Masilla epoxi para carrocería; Masilla de poliéster para carrocería; Masilla de fibra de vidrio; Masilla reforzada con metal; Pegamento para mechas de neumáticos; Sellador de neumáticos; Líquido vulcanizante; Resina espesa para parabrisas; Resina fluida para parabrisas; Otro
sk-SK: Typ opravnej hmoty: Epoxidový tmel na karosérie; Polyesterový tmel na karosérie; Sklolaminátový tmel; Kovom vystužený tmel; Lepidlo na opravu pneumatík; Tesniaci prostriedok na pneumatiky; Vulkanizačná kvapalina; Živica na čelné sklá (hustá); Živica na čelné sklá (riedka); Iné
zh-TW: 修補劑類型: 車身補土環氧樹脂; 聚酯纖維車身補土; 玻璃纖維補土; 金屬強化補土; 補胎膠水; 輪胎密封劑; 硫化劑; 擋風玻璃樹脂 (濃); 擋風玻璃樹脂 (稀); 其他
ro-RO: Tipul compusului de reparare: Chit auto epoxidic; Chit auto poliesteric; Chit cu fibră de sticlă; Chit armat cu metal; Adeziv pentru șnur de vulcanizare; Etanșant pentru anvelope; Soluție de vulcanizare; Rășină pentru parbriz cu vâscozitate ridicată; Rășină pentru parbriz cu vâscozitate scăzută; Altele
en: Repair compound type: Body filler epoxy; Body filler polyester; Fiberglass filler; Metal-reinforced filler; Tire plug cement; Tire sealant; Vulcanizing fluid; Windshield resin thick; Windshield resin thin; Other
ru: Тип ремонтного состава: Эпоксидная шпатлевка для кузова; Полиэфирная шпатлевка для кузова; Шпатлевка со стекловолокном; Шпатлевка с металлическим наполнителем; Клей для жгутов шин; Герметик для шин; Вулканизирующая жидкость; Густая смола для лобового стекла; Жидкая смола для лобового стекла; Другое
th: ประเภทของสารซ่อมแซม: อีพ็อกซี่อุดรอยโป๊วสี; โพลีเอสเตอร์อุดรอยโป๊วสี; ฟิลเลอร์ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ฟิลเลอร์เสริมโลหะ; กาวปะยาง; น้ำยาอุดรอยรั่วยาง; น้ำยาหลอมยาง; เรซินซ่อมกระจกหน้ารถแบบข้น; เรซินซ่อมกระจกหน้ารถแบบเหลว; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta popravne smjese: Epoksidni kit za karoseriju; Poliesterski kit za karoseriju; Punilo od stakloplastike; Punilo ojačano metalom; Ljepilo za čepove za gume; Sredstvo za brtvljenje guma; Vulkanizerska tekućina; Gusta smola za vjetrobransko staklo; Rijetka smola za vjetrobransko staklo; Ostalo
tr: Tamir bileşiği türü: Kaporta dolgu epoksisi; Kaporta dolgu polyesteri; Fiberglas dolgu; Metal takviyeli dolgu; Lastik fitil solüsyonu; Lastik sızdırmazlık sıvısı; Vulkanize solüsyonu; Kalın cam reçinesi; İnce cam reçinesi; Diğer
pt-BR: Reparo composto tipo: Massa epóxi; Massa de poliéster; Massa de fibra de vidro; Massa com reforço de metal; Cimento para remendo de pneu; Selante de pneu; Fluido vulcanizante; Resina para para-brisa espessa; Resina para para-brisa fina; Outro
cs: Typ opravné směsi: Karosářský tmel (epoxidový); Karosářský tmel (polyesterový); Tmel se skelným vláknem; Tmel vyztužený kovem; Lepidlo na knoty do pneumatik; Těsnicí tmel na pneumatiky; Vulkanizační roztok; Hustá pryskyřice na čelní skla; Řídká pryskyřice na čelní skla; Jiné
lt-LT: Remonto mišinio tipas: Kėbulo epoksidinis glaistas; Kėbulo poliesterinis glaistas; Stiklo pluošto užpildas; Metalu armuotas užpildas; Padangų kaiščių klijai; Padangų sandariklis; Vulkanizavimo skystis; Tiršta priekinio stiklo derva; Skysta priekinio stiklo derva; Kita
de: Typ der Reparaturmasse: Epoxidharz-Karosseriespachtel; Polyester-Karosseriespachtel; Glasfaserspachtel; Metallverstärkter Spachtel; Kleber für Reifenstopfen; Reifendichtmittel; Vulkanisierflüssigkeit; Dickflüssiges Harz für Windschutzscheiben; Dünnflüssiges Harz für Windschutzscheiben; Sonstiges